Maryland, session 2025, SB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–144.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE INSUFFICIENT CONDOMINIUM RESERVE
ACCOUNT GRANT FUND.
(4) “LOW–INCOME UNIT OWNER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OWNER OF A
CONDOMINIUM UNIT WHO IS A MEMBER OF A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN INCOME THAT IS
NOT GREATER THAN 80% OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(5) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(B) THERE IS AN INSUFFICIENT CONDOMINIUM RESERVE ACCOUNT
GRANT FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO LOW–INCOME
UNIT OWNERS TO PAY FOR INCREASED ASSESSMENTS NECESSARY FOR A
CONDOMINIUM ASSOCIATION TO MEET RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENTS UNDER
§ 11–109.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE SECRETARY SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;

SENATE BILL 1011 3
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO LOW–INCOME
UNIT OWNERS TO COVER INCREASED ASSESSMENTS NECESSARY TO MEET THE
REQUIRED RESERVES OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(I) ADMINISTER THE FUND AND AWARD GRANTS FROM THE
FUND TO ELIGIBLE LOW–INCOME UNIT OWNERS;
(II) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR LOW–INCOME UNIT OWNERS
TO APPLY FOR AND RECEIVE GRANTS FROM THE FUND; AND
(III) PUBLICIZE THE FUND AND THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR
THE FUND.
(2) PRIORITY FOR GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
GIVEN TO LOW–INCOME UNIT OWNERS WHO ARE AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD.
(3) BY DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, LOW–INCOME UNIT OWNERS WHO
RECEIVE GRANTS FROM THE FUND SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT
REGARDING THE RESERVE ACCOUNT BALANCE IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND SHALL BE SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND
IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR A UNIT OWNER TO PAY FOR INCREASED ASSESSMENTS AGAINST
THE OWNER TO MEET THE INCREASED RESERVE ACCOUNT AMOUNT REQUIRED
UNDER § 11–109.2 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 1011
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE INSUFFICIENT CONDOMINIUM RESERVE
ACCOUNT GRANT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.